Utah statutes.
4-16-6.   Chapter does not apply to seed not intended for sowing, to seed at seed processing plant, or to seed transported or delivered for transportation in the ordinary course of business.

This chapter does not apply to:

(1)  seed or grain not intended for sowing;

(2)  seed at, or consigned to, a seed processing or cleaning plant; provided, that any label or any other representation which is made with respect to the uncleaned or unprocessed seed is subject to this chapter; or

(3)  to any carrier in respect to any seed transported or delivered for transportation in the ordinary course of its business as a carrier; provided, the carrier is not engaged in producing, processing, or marketing agricultural, vegetable, flower, or tree and shrub seeds or seeds for sprouting.



Amended by Chapter 81, 1997 General Session

